Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.760

Establishing zones.

For the purpose set forth in RCW 36.70.750 the county may divide a county, or portions thereof, into zones which, by number, shape, area and classification are deemed to be best suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.760. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 76.]